Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 4. Protection of Purchasers.

Collateral references. —

Validity and enforceability of condominium owner’s covenant to pay dues or fees to sports or recreational facility. 39 ALR4th 129.

Sec. 34.08.510.
Applicability.

The provisions of AS

34.08.510

—

34.08.700

apply to all units subject to this chapter, except as provided in (b) of this section or as modified or waived by agreement of purchasers of units in a common interest community in which each unit is restricted to nonresidential use.

A public offering statement and a resale certificate are not required to be prepared or delivered on

a gratuitous disposition of a unit;

a disposition under a court order;

a disposition by a governmental agency;

a disposition by foreclosure or deed in lieu of foreclosure;

a disposition to a dealer;

a disposition that may be canceled at any time and for any reason by the purchaser without penalty;

a disposition of a unit in a planned community in which the declaration limits the maximum annual assessment of a unit to not more than $300, as adjusted under AS

34.08.820

, if

the declarant has a reasonable and good faith belief that the maximum stated assessment will be sufficient to pay the expenses of the planned community;

the declaration cannot be amended to increase the assessment during the period of declarant control without the consent of all unit owners; and

the planned community is not subject to development rights; or

a disposition of property by a nonprofit development corporation if that corporation is eligible for assistance from the Neighborhood Reinvestment Corporation organized under 42 U.S.C. 8101 — 42 U.S.C. 8107 (Neighborhood Reinvestment Corporation Act) for neighborhood housing services, neighborhood revitalization, and economic development projects in a community.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985; am § 1 ch 104 SLA 1990)

Sec. 34.08.520.
Liability for public offering statement requirements.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, a declarant, before offering an interest in a unit to the public, shall prepare a public offering statement conforming to the requirements of AS

34.08.530

,

34.08.540

,

34.08.550

, and

34.08.560

.

A declarant may transfer responsibility for preparation of all or a part of the public offering statement to a successor declarant or to a dealer who intends to offer units in the common interest community. On the transfer of responsibility, the transferor shall provide the transferee with information necessary to enable the transferee to fulfill the requirements of (a) of this section.

A declarant or dealer who offers a unit to a purchaser shall deliver a public offering statement, or a preliminary version of the public offering statement that reasonably reflects the contents of the public offering statement that is subsequently delivered to a purchaser, in the manner required by AS

34.08.580(a)

. The person who prepared all or a part of the public offering statement is liable under AS

34.08.580

and

34.08.670

for any false or misleading statement set out in the statement or for any omission of a material fact from the statement with respect to the portion of the public offering statement that the person prepared. If a declarant did not prepare any part of a public offering statement, the declarant is not liable for a false or misleading statement set out in the statement or for an omission of a material fact from the statement unless the declarant had actual knowledge of the statement or omission or, in the exercise of reasonable care, should have known of the statement or omission.

If a unit is part of a common interest community and is part of a real estate regime where a public offering statement is required under the laws of the state before the unit is offered for sale, a single public offering statement conforming to the requirements of AS

34.08.530

,

34.08.540

,

34.08.550

, and

34.08.560

may be prepared and delivered in lieu of providing two or more public offering statements.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985; am § 1 ch 120 SLA 2002)

Sec. 34.08.530.
Public offering statements generally.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, a public offering statement must fully and accurately contain or disclose

the name and principal address of the declarant and of the common interest community and indicate whether the common interest community is a condominium, cooperative, or planned community;

a general description of the common interest community, including, in a building constructed for residential purposes with horizontal boundaries, the area of the interior surface of floors available for residential purposes and, to the extent possible, the types, number, and declarant’s schedule for the commencement and completion of construction of buildings and amenities that the declarant anticipates including in the common interest community;

the number of units in the common interest community;

copies and a brief narrative description of the significant features of the declaration, other than plats and plans, and

any recorded covenants, conditions, restrictions, and reservations affecting the common interest community;

the bylaws and any rules or regulations of the association;

copies of any contracts and leases to be signed by purchasers at closing; and

a brief narrative description of any contracts or leases that will or may be subject to cancellation by the association under AS

34.08.360

;

any current balance sheet and a projected budget for the association, either within or as an exhibit to the public offering statement, for one year after the date of the first conveyance to a purchaser, and the current budget of the association, the name of the person who prepared the budget, and a statement of the budget’s assumptions concerning occupancy, assumptions concerning the calculation of the amount of reserves certified by a certified architect or engineer, and inflation factors, including, without limitation,

a statement of the amount included in the budget as a reserve for repairs and replacement including the estimated cost of repair or replacement cost and the estimated useful life of the asset to be repaired or replaced;

a statement of any other reserves;

the projected common expense assessment by category of expenditures for the association; and

the projected monthly common expense assessment for each type of unit;

any services not reflected in the budget that the declarant provides, or expenses that the declarant pays and that the declarant expects may become a common expense of the association at a subsequent time and the projected common expense assessment attributable to each of those services or expenses for the association and for each type of unit;

any initial or special fee due from the purchaser at closing, together with a description of the purpose and method of calculating the fee;

a description of liens, defects, or encumbrances on or affecting the title to the common interest community;

a description of financing offered or arranged by the declarant;

the terms and significant limitations of warranties provided by the declarant, including statutory warranties and limitations on the enforcement of the warranties or on damages;

a statement that

within 15 days after receipt of a public offering statement or a preliminary version of the public offering statement that reasonably reflects the contents of the public offering statement that is subsequently delivered to a purchaser, a purchaser, before conveyance, may cancel any contract for purchase of a unit from a declarant;

if a declarant fails to provide a public offering statement to a purchaser before conveying a unit, the purchaser may recover from the declarant up to 10 percent of the sales price of the unit plus 10 percent of the share, proportionate to the common expense liability of the unit, of any indebtedness of the association secured by security interests encumbering the common interest community; and

a purchaser who receives the public offering statement, or a preliminary version of the public offering statement that reasonably reflects the contents of the public offering statement that is subsequently delivered to a purchaser, more than 15 days before signing a contract cannot cancel the contract;

a statement of any unsatisfied judgments or pending suits against the association, and the status of any pending suits material to the common interest community of which a declarant has actual knowledge;

a statement that a deposit made in connection with the purchase of a unit will be held in an escrow account until closing and will be returned to the purchaser if the purchaser cancels the contract under AS

34.08.580

, together with the name and address of the escrow agent;

any restraints on alienation of any portion of the common interest community and any restrictions

on use, occupancy, and alienation of the unit; and

on the amount for which a unit may be sold or on the amount that may be received by a unit owner on sale, condemnation, or casualty loss to the unit or to the common interest community, or on termination of the common interest community;

a description of the insurance coverage provided for the benefit of unit owners;

current or expected fees or charges to be paid by a unit owner for the use of the common elements and other facilities related to the common interest community;

the extent to which financial arrangements have been provided for completion of improvements that the declarant is obligated to build under AS

34.08.690

;

a brief narrative description of zoning and other land use requirements affecting the common interest community;

each unusual and material circumstance, feature, or characteristic of the common interest community and the units; and

in a cooperative,

whether each unit owner will be entitled, for federal, state, and local income tax purposes, to a pass-through of deductions for payments made by the association for real estate taxes and interest paid the holder of a security interest encumbering the cooperative; and

a statement as to the effect on each unit owner if the association fails to pay real estate taxes or payments due the holder of a security interest encumbering the cooperative.

If a common interest community composed of not more than 12 units is not subject to any development rights and power is not reserved to a declarant to make the common interest community part of a larger common interest community, group of common interest communities, or other real estate, a public offering statement may but need not include the information required by (a)(9), (10) and (15) — (19) of this section and the narrative descriptions of documents required by (a)(4) of this section.

A declarant promptly shall amend the public offering statement to report any material change in the information required by this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985; am § 2 ch 120 SLA 2002)

Sec. 34.08.540.
Common interest communities subject to development rights.

If the declaration provides that a common interest community is subject to development rights, the public offering statement must disclose, in addition to the information required by AS

34.08.530

,

the maximum number of units, and the maximum number of units per acre, that may be created;

a statement of the number or the percentage of the units that may be created that will be restricted exclusively to residential use, or a statement that representations have not been made regarding use restrictions;

if any of the units that may be built within real estate subject to development rights are not to be restricted exclusively to residential use, a statement, with respect to each portion of the real estate, of the maximum percentage of the real estate areas, and the maximum percentage of the floor areas of all units that may be created that are not restricted exclusively to residential use;

a brief narrative description of the development rights reserved by a declarant and of any conditions relating to or limitations upon the exercise of development rights;

a statement of the maximum extent to which the allocated interests of each unit may be changed by the exercise of a development right described in (3) of this section;

a statement of the extent to which a building or other improvement that may be erected under a development right in any part of the common interest community will be compatible with existing buildings and improvements in the common interest community in terms of architectural style, quality of construction, and size, or a statement that assurances have not been made in that regard;

a general description of each other improvement that may be made and limited common elements that may be created within a part of the common interest community under a development right reserved by the declarant, or a statement that assurances have not been made in that regard;

a statement of any limitations as to the location of any building or other improvement that may be made within a part of the common interest community under a development right reserved by the declarant, or a statement that assurances have not been made in that regard;

a statement that the limited common elements created under a development right reserved by the declarant will be of the same general type and size as the limited common elements within other parts of the common interest community, or a statement of the type and size planned, or a statement that assurances have not been made in that regard;

a statement that the proportion of limited common elements to units created under a development right reserved by the declarant will be approximately equal to the proportion existing within other parts of the common interest community, or a statement of any other assurances in that regard, or a statement that assurances have not been made in that regard;

a statement that each restriction in the declaration affecting use, occupancy, and alienation of a unit will apply to each unit created under a development right reserved by the declarant, or a statement of a differentiation that may be made as to the units, or a statement that assurances have not been made in that regard; and

a statement of the extent to which an assurance made under this section applies or does not apply if a development right is not exercised by the declarant.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.08.550.
Time shares.

If the declaration provides that ownership or occupancy of a unit is or may be in time shares, the public offering statement must disclose, in addition to the information required by AS

34.08.530

,

the number and identity of units in which time shares may be created;

the total number of time shares that may be created;

the minimum duration of any time shares that may be created;

the extent to which the creation of time shares will or may affect the enforceability of the lien of the association for assessments under AS

34.08.470

;

any restraint on the power of the purchaser of the time-share unit to transfer the interest in the time-share unit;

whether the time-share unit is included in an exchange program, the present cost and a good faith estimate of the future cost to the purchaser from the exchange program; and

whether the purchaser is required to become a member of the exchange program.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.08.560.
Common interest communities containing conversion property.

The public offering statement of a common interest community containing conversion property must contain, in addition to the information required by AS

34.08.530

,

a statement by the declarant, based on a report prepared by a registered architect or engineer, describing the present condition of all structural components and mechanical and electrical installations material to the use and enjoyment of the property;

a statement by the declarant of the expected useful life of each item reported on in (1) of this subsection or a statement that representations have not been made in that regard; and

a list of any outstanding notices of uncured violations of building code or other municipal regulations, together with the estimated cost of curing the violations.

This section applies only to property that contains a unit that may be occupied for residential use.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.08.570.
Common interest community securities.

If an interest in a common interest community is currently registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission of the United States, a declarant satisfies each requirement relating to the preparation of a public offering statement of this chapter if the declarant delivers to the purchaser a copy of the public offering statement filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. An interest in a common interest community is not subject to the registration requirements of AS 45.56.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985; am § 8 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, substituted “AS 45.56” for “AS 45.55” at the end.

Sec. 34.08.580.
Purchaser’s right to cancel.

A person required to deliver a public offering statement under AS

34.08.520(c)

shall provide each purchaser with a copy of the public offering statement and each amendment to the statement, or a preliminary version of the public offering statement that reasonably reflects the contents of the public offering statement that is subsequently delivered to a purchaser, before conveyance of the unit, and not later than the date of a contract of sale. If a purchaser is not given the public offering statement, or a preliminary version of the public offering statement that reasonably reflects the contents of the public offering statement that is subsequently delivered to a purchaser, more than 15 days before execution of a contract for the purchase of a unit, the purchaser, before conveyance, may cancel the contract within 15 days of receipt of the public offering statement or preliminary version of the public offering statement.

A purchaser who wishes to cancel a contract under (a) of this section may cancel the contract by hand delivering notice of the cancellation to the offeror or by mailing notice of the cancellation by prepaid United States mail to the offeror or to the agent for service of process of the offeror. Cancellation is without penalty and each payment made by the purchaser before cancellation must be refunded promptly to the purchaser.

If a person required to deliver a public offering statement under AS

34.08.520(c)

fails to provide a purchaser to whom a unit has been conveyed with the public offering statement and each amendment to the statement under (a) of this section, the purchaser, in addition to any right to damages or other relief, is entitled to receive from the person an amount equal to 10 percent of the sale price of the unit, plus 10 percent of the share, proportionate to the common expense liability, of an indebtedness of the association secured by security interests encumbering the common interest community.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985; am § 3 ch 120 SLA 2002)

Sec. 34.08.590.
Resales of units.

Except for a sale in which delivery of a public offering statement is required, or unless the sale is exempt under AS

34.08.510(b)

, a unit owner shall furnish to a purchaser before execution of a contract for sale of a unit or before conveyance a copy of the declaration, as amended, the bylaws, the rules or regulations of the association, and a certificate containing a statement disclosing

the effect on the proposed disposition of a right of first refusal or other restraint on the free alienability of the unit;

the amount of the monthly common expense assessment and any unpaid common expense or special assessment currently due and payable from the selling unit owner;

any other fee payable by unit owners;

any capital expenditures in excess of $3,000 approved by the executive board for the current and two next succeeding fiscal years;

the amount of reserves for capital expenditures and of any portions of the reserves designated by the association for a specified project;

the most recent regularly prepared balance sheet and income and expense statement, if any, of the association;

the current operating budget of the association;

any unsatisfied judgment against the association and the status of any pending suit in which the association is a defendant or plaintiff;

any insurance coverage provided for the benefit of unit owners;

whether the executive board has knowledge that any alterations or improvements to the unit or to the limited common elements assigned to the unit violate any provision of the declaration;

whether the executive board has knowledge of any violation of a health or safety, fire, or building code or other law, ordinance, or regulation with respect to the unit, the limited common elements assigned to the unit, or any other portion of the common interest community;

a statement of the remaining term of a leasehold estate affecting the common interest community and the provisions governing an extension or renewal of the lease;

a statement of any restrictions in the declaration affecting the amount that may be received by a unit owner upon sale, condemnation, casualty loss to the unit or the common interest community, or termination of the common interest community; and

in a cooperative, an accountant’s statement, if any was prepared, as to the deductibility for federal income tax purposes by the unit owner of real estate taxes and interest paid by the association.

The association, within 10 days after a written request by a unit owner and the payment of a reasonable fee, shall furnish a certificate containing the information necessary to enable the unit owner to comply with this section. A unit owner providing a certificate under (a) of this section is not liable to the purchaser for erroneous information provided by the association and included in the certificate.

A purchaser is not liable for an unpaid assessment or fee greater than the amount set out in the certificate prepared by the association. A unit owner is not liable to a purchaser for the failure or delay of the association to provide the certificate in a timely manner, but the purchase contract is voidable by the purchaser until the certificate has been provided and for five days after the certificate was provided or until conveyance, whichever occurs first.

A unit owner in a planned community that was created before January 1, 1986, is not exempt under AS

34.08.050

, and does not collect assessments as a planned community and has not formed an association or elected officers or an executive board may comply with (a) and (b) of this section by furnishing the purchaser of the unit an affidavit in recordable form

stating that assessments are not collected, the last date assessments were collected, if known, the amount of the last assessment, if known, and the reason assessments ceased;

stating that an association has not been formed or that no officers or executive board exists; and

providing the purchaser a copy of

the recorded declaration, if any, and any amendment to the declaration;

bylaws, rules, and regulations of the association, if any; and

a brief narrative description of

the real estate comprising the planned community; and

obligations to pay for real estate taxes, insurance premiums, maintenance, and improvements of the real estate described in the declaration.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985; am § 8 ch 61 SLA 1986)

Collateral references. —

Liability of owner of unit in condominium, recreational development, time-share property, or the like for assessment in support of common facilities levied against and unpaid by prior owner. 39 ALR4th 114.

Sec. 34.08.600.
Escrow of deposits.

A deposit made in connection with the purchase or reservation of a unit from a person required to deliver a public offering statement under AS

34.08.520(c)

must be placed in escrow and held either in this state or in the state where the unit is located in an account designated solely for that purpose by a licensed title insurance company, an attorney, a licensed real estate broker, an independent bonded escrow company, or an institution whose accounts are insured by a governmental agency or instrumentality until

delivered to the declarant at closing;

delivered to the declarant because of the purchaser’s default under a contract to purchase the unit; or

refunded to the purchaser.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.08.610.
Release of liens.

In a sale of a unit where delivery of a public offering statement is required under AS

34.08.520(c)

, a seller before conveying a unit shall record and furnish to the purchaser a release of each lien, except a lien on real estate that a declarant has the right to withdraw from the common interest community, that the purchaser does not expressly agree to take subject to or assume and that encumbers

in a condominium, the unit and its common element interest; or

in a cooperative or planned community, the unit and any limited common elements assigned to the unit.

Before conveying real estate to the association, the declarant shall have the real estate released from

each lien the foreclosure of which would deprive unit owners of a right of access to or easement of support of their units; and

each other lien on the real estate unless the public offering statement describes certain real estate that may be conveyed subject to liens in specified amounts.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.08.620.
Conversion property.

A declarant of a common interest community containing conversion property, and any dealer who intends to offer units in a common interest community containing conversion units, shall give each residential tenant and each residential subtenant in possession of a portion of conversion property notice of the conversion and provide each person with the public offering statement no later than 180 days before the tenant and any subtenant in possession are required to vacate. If the conversion property consists of a mobile home park, notice of the conversion and delivery of a public offering statement shall be provided no later than one year before the tenant and any subtenant in possession are required to vacate. The notice must set out generally the rights of tenants and subtenants under this section and shall be hand delivered to the tenant or subtenant in possession or mailed by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the tenant and subtenant at the address of the unit or any other mailing address provided by a tenant. The failure to give notice as required by this section is a defense to an action for possession and the terms of the tenancy may not be altered during the notice period provided by this subsection. A tenant or subtenant may not be required to vacate upon less than 180 days’ notice and a tenant and a subtenant in possession in a mobile home park may not be required to vacate upon less than one year’s notice except for one of the following reasons:

the tenant or subtenant has defaulted in the payment of rent owed;

the tenant or subtenant has been convicted of violating a federal or state law or local ordinance, and that violation is continuing and is detrimental to the health, safety, or welfare of other dwellers or tenants in the mobile home park; and

the tenant or subtenant has violated a provision, enforceable under AS

34.03.130

, of the rental agreement or lease signed by both parties and not prohibited by law including rent and the terms of agreement.

For 90 days after delivery or mailing of the notice described in (a) of this section, the person required to give the notice shall offer to convey each unit or proposed unit occupied for residential use to the tenant who leases or rents the unit. If a tenant fails to purchase the unit during the 90-day period, the offeror shall extend a right of first refusal to the tenant who is leasing or renting the unit at the time of the conversion. The offeror may not offer to dispose of an interest in the unit at a price or on terms more favorable to the offeree than the price or terms offered to the tenant while the tenant is in possession. The tenant must exercise the right of first refusal within 90 days from the receipt of the offer and must provide the offeror a valid letter of intent or a preliminary loan commitment from a bank or mortgage lending institution within 30 days of receipt of the offer. This subsection does not apply to a unit in conversion property if the unit will be restricted exclusively to nonresidential use or if the boundaries of the converted unit do not substantially conform to the dimensions of the residential unit before conversion.

If a seller, in violation of (b) of this section, conveys a unit for value to a purchaser who has no knowledge of the violation, the recording of the deed conveying the unit or, in a cooperative, the conveyance of the unit, extinguishes any right a tenant may have under (b) of this section to purchase the unit if the deed states that the seller has complied with (b) of this section, but the conveyance does not affect the right of a tenant to recover damages from the seller for a violation of (b) of this section.

If a notice of conversion specifies a date by which a unit or proposed unit must be vacated and otherwise complies with the provisions of AS

09.45.060

—

09.45.160

, the notice also constitutes a notice to quit.

Nothing in this section permits termination of a lease by a declarant in violation of its terms.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985; am § 3 ch 13 SLA 1986)

Sec. 34.08.630.
Express warranties of quality.

An express warranty made by a seller to a purchaser of a unit, if relied upon by the purchaser, is created as follows:

any affirmation of fact or promise that relates to the unit, its use, or rights appurtenant to the unit, area improvements to the common interest community that would directly benefit the unit, or the right to use or have the benefit of facilities not located in the common interest community, creates an express warranty that the unit and related rights and uses will conform to the affirmation or promise;

a model or description of the physical characteristics of the common interest community, including plans and specifications of or for improvements, creates an express warranty that the common interest community will conform to the model or description;

a description of the quantity or extent of the real estate comprising the common interest community, including plats of surveys, creates an express warranty that the common interest community will conform to the description, subject to customary tolerances; and

a provision that a purchaser may put a unit only to a specified use is an express warranty that the specified use is lawful.

Formal words such as “warranty” or “guarantee” and the specific intention to make a warranty are not necessary to create an express warranty of quality, but a statement purporting to be merely an opinion or commendation of the real estate or its value does not create a warranty.

A conveyance of a unit transfers to the purchaser each express warranty of quality made by a previous seller.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.08.640.
Implied warranties of quality.

A declarant and a dealer warrant that a unit will be in at least as good condition at the earlier of the time of the conveyance or delivery of possession as it was at the time of contracting, reasonable wear and tear excepted.

A declarant and a dealer impliedly warrant that a unit and the common elements in the common interest community are suitable for the ordinary uses of real estate of its type and that any improvements made or contracted for by the declarant or dealer, or made by any person before the creation of the common interest community, will be

free from defective materials; and

constructed in accordance with applicable law, according to sound engineering and construction standards, and in a skillful and workmanlike manner.

A declarant and a dealer warrant to a purchaser of a unit that may be used for residential use that an existing use, continuation of which is contemplated by the parties, does not violate applicable law at the earlier of the time of conveyance or delivery of possession.

Warranties imposed by this section may be excluded or modified under AS

34.08.650

.

For purposes of this section, improvements made or contracted for by an affiliate of a declarant are made or contracted for by the declarant.

A conveyance of a unit transfers to the purchaser all of the declarant’s implied warranties of quality.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.08.650.
Exclusion or modification of implied warranties of quality.

Except as limited by (b) of this section with respect to a purchaser of a unit that may be used for residential use, implied warranties of quality

may be excluded or modified by written agreement of the parties; and

are excluded by a written expression of disclaimer such as “as is,” “with all faults,” or other language that in common understanding calls the attention of the purchaser to the exclusion of warranties.

With respect to a purchaser of a unit that may be occupied for residential use, a general disclaimer of implied warranties of quality is not effective, but a declarant and a dealer may disclaim liability in an instrument signed by the purchaser for a specified defect or specified failure to comply with applicable law, if the defect or failure entered into and became a part of the basis of the bargain.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.08.660.
Statute of limitations for warranties.

A judicial proceeding for breach of an obligation arising under AS

34.08.630

or

34.08.640

must be commenced within six years after the cause of action accrues, but the parties may agree to reduce the period of limitation to not less than two years. If the unit may be occupied for residential use, an agreement to reduce the period of limitation must be evidenced by a separate instrument executed by the purchaser.

Subject to (c) of this section, a cause of action for breach of warranty of quality, regardless of the purchaser’s lack of knowledge of the breach, accrues

as to a unit, at the time the purchaser to whom the warranty is first made enters into possession if a possessory interest was conveyed or at the time of acceptance of the instrument of conveyance if a nonpossessory interest was conveyed; and

as to each common element, at the time the common element is completed or, if later, as to

a common element that may be added to the common interest community or a portion of the common interest community, at the time the first unit is conveyed to a bona fide purchaser; or

a common element within any other portion of the common interest community, at the time the first unit is conveyed to a bona fide purchaser.

If a warranty of quality explicitly extends to future performance or duration of an improvement or component of the common interest community, the cause of action accrues at the time the breach is discovered or at the end of the warranty period, whichever is earlier.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1990, in (a) of this section, “AS

34.08.650

or this section” was deleted and “AS

34.08.630

or

34.08.640

” was inserted to correct a manifest error in ch. 95, SLA 1985.

Sec. 34.08.670.
Effect of violations on rights of action.

If a declarant or any other person subject to this chapter fails to comply with a provision of this chapter or with a provision of the declaration or bylaws, a person or class of persons adversely affected by the failure to comply has a claim for appropriate relief.
Punitive damages may be awarded for a wilful failure to comply with this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.08.680.
Labeling of promotional material.

Promotional material may not be displayed or delivered to a prospective purchaser that describes or portrays an improvement that is not in existence unless the description or portrayal of the improvement in the promotional material is conspicuously labeled or identified either as “MUST BE BUILT” or as “NEED NOT BE BUILT.”

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.08.690.
Declarant’s obligation to complete and restore.

Except for an improvement labeled “NEED NOT BE BUILT,” the declarant shall complete each improvement depicted on a site plan or other graphic representation, including any plats or plans prepared under AS

34.08.180

, whether or not the site plan or other graphic representation is contained in the public offering statement or in promotional material distributed by or for the declarant.

The declarant is liable for the prompt repair and restoration, to a condition compatible with the remainder of the common interest community, of a portion of the common interest community affected by the exercise of rights reserved under or created by AS

34.08.180

,

34.08.190

,

34.08.200

,

34.08.210

,

34.08.230

, or

34.08.240

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.08.700.
Substantial completion of units.

In the sale of a unit for which delivery of a public offering statement is required, a contract of sale may be executed, but an interest in the unit may not be conveyed until the declaration is recorded, a plat or plan that accompanies the declaration is filed and recorded, and the unit is substantially completed as evidenced by issuance of a certificate of occupancy authorized by law or by a recorded certificate of substantial completion executed by

an independent registered engineer, architect, or land surveyor;

an appraiser with the designation of senior residential appraiser, senior real property appraiser, or senior real estate analyst of the Society of Real Estate Appraisers;

a residential member, or member of the appraisal institute, of the American Institute of Real Estate Appraisers; or

an individual with a designation established by regulation of the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation for fee appraisers who certify the completion of construction.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985; am § 25 ch 161 SLA 1988)